Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201371-1907
Child passenger
restraint; requirements; violation; penalty.

Any
person furnishing foster care who is subject to licensure under section 71-1902 or the Children's Residential Facilities
and Placing Licensure Act, when transporting in a motor vehicle
any children for whom care is being furnished, shall use an approved child
passenger restraint system for each child, except that an occupant protection
system as defined in section 60-6,265 may be used for any child six years
of age or older.

Any person violating this section shall be guilty of an infraction
as defined in section 29-431 and shall have his or her license to furnish
foster care revoked or suspended by the Department of Health and Human Services.

For purposes of this section, approved child passenger restraint
system shall mean a restraint system which meets Federal Motor Vehicle Safety
Standard 213 as developed by the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration,
as such standard existed on July 20, 2002.

Laws 1982, LB 69, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 386, § 4;

Laws 1992, LB 958, § 10;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 475;

Laws 1995, LB 401, § 28;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 586;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 174;

Laws 2000, LB 410, § 3;

Laws 2002, LB 1073, § 3;

Laws 2013, LB265, § 44.
May 26, 2013
Children's Residential Facilities and Placing Licensure Act, see section 71-1924.